Nebraska, session 109, LB356.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB356 LB356
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 82-309, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
82-309 There is hereby created the Nebraska Arts Council to consist
of fifteen members to be appointed by the Governor with the approval of
the Legislature from among citizens of Nebraska who are known for their
professional competence and experience in connection with the arts. In
making such appointments, consideration shall be given to recommendations
made by representative civic, educational, and professional associations
and groups concerned with, or engaged in, the production or presentation
of the arts generally.
Sec. 2. Original section 82-309, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-